Hawaii statutes.
[§386-21.2] Treatment plans. (a) A
physician may transmit a treatment plan to an employer by mail or facsimile;
provided that the physician shall send the treatment plan to an address or
facsimile number provided by the employer.

(b) Beginning January 1, 2021, an employer
shall allow a physician to transmit a treatment plan to an employer by mail,
facsimile, or secure electronic means; provided that the physician shall send
the treatment plan to an address or facsimile number provided by the employer.

(c) A treatment plan shall be deemed received
by an employer when the plan is sent by mail or facsimile with reasonable
evidence showing that the treatment plan was received.

(d) A treatment plan shall be deemed accepted
if an employer fails to file with the director:

(1) An objection to the treatment plan;

(2) Any applicable documentary evidence supporting
the denial; and

(3) A copy of the denied treatment plan,

copying the physician and the injured employee.

(e) After acceptance of the treatment plan, an
employer may file an objection to the plan if new documentary evidence
supporting the denial is received by the employer. [L 2016, c 101, §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next